Louisiana, session 2026, SB242.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2116.31(B)(5) and 2116.32(C)(6) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2116.31. Scope; purpose; definitions
* * *
B. For the purpose of this Part unless the context clearly otherwise requires:
* * *
(5) "Home health aide services" means semi-skilled assistance by qualified
personnel with activities of daily living provided to the patient who requires
assistance in at least two areas of functioning and monitoring of vital signs, reporting
to a healthcare professional under a written plan of care, and requiring a clinical
note for each patient visit.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-538 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 242
§2116.32. Licensing of home health agencies; applications; fees, disposition of fees
* * *
C. All initial applicants shall submit a request in writing to the department
on application forms furnished by it. Additional information required by the
department shall be provided by the applicant on supplemental forms as needed. The
application shall be accompanied by a non-refundable application fee, the amount
of which shall be promulgated in the minimum standards. Licenses shall be renewed
on an annual basis only for those agencies who are in substantial compliance with
minimum standards. In addition the applicant shall:
* * *
(6) Disclose in writing any financial or familial relationship with any other
entity providing home health care healthcare services in the state.
* * *